District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-616.02

Grievances.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1602, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(u), 33 DCR 7241
May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-128, § 2(b), 37 DCR 2099
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(t), 43 DCR 2978
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(r), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-617.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-346.2.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-603.01.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(r) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998. See note to § 1-616.01.